California statutes. Water Code
(a) The project for habitat restoration at Gunnerson Pond is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the final project modification report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated October 1997, as authorized by Section 1135 of the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-662), and as previously authorized by Section 12750, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the
 department, in an amount that may not exceed 60 percent of the nonfederal costs of the project. The department may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(b) The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the project modification report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated October 1997 will be furnished by the district in connection with the project adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The district, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with
 Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12721.8.

Any local entity, for the purposes of carrying out a project authorized by Sections 12661.2, 12670.7, 12670.8, 12670.14, 12670.20, 12684.2, 12706.3, 12721.5, and 12721.5, may use, whenever feasible, the services of the California Conservation Corps and certified local conservation corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12722.

The project for flood protection on Alameda Creek in Alameda County is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 128, 87th Congress, 2d Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, Public Law 87-874, 87th Congress, 2d Session, 76 Stat. 1173, at an estimated cost to the State of two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

12723.

The Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation, required by the act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173), will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized by Section 12722.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

12724.

The Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12722 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

12725.

The project for Russian River, Dry Creek, California is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 128, 87th Congress, 2d Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, Public Law 87-874, 87th Congress, 2d Session, 76 Stat. 1173, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out said project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2056.)
-------------------------------------------

12726.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation, required by the act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173), will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized by Section 12725.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2056.)
-------------------------------------------

12727.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12725 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2056.)
-------------------------------------------

12727.1.

The project for flood control on Sonoma Creek in Sonoma County is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 224, 89th Congress, as adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1965), at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of
 available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

12727.2.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1965), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12727.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

12727.3.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12727.1, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

12728.

The project for flood protection on Redwood Creek in Humboldt County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 497, 87th Congress, as authorized by Act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1962”), at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

12729.

The County of Humboldt shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1962”), will be furnished by the county in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12728.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

12730.

The County of Humboldt, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12728, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

12731.

The project for flood control construction of debris basins and channel clearing in the Santa Barbara, California, area as authorized by Public Law 88-635, 78 Stat. 1023, is adopted and authorized at such cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

12732.

The County of Santa Barbara shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Section 2 of the Flood Control Act of 1938 (Public Law 761-75th Congress), will be furnished by the county in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12731.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

12733.

The County of Santa Barbara, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12731, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 300.)
-------------------------------------------

12734.

The project for Corte Madera Creek, Marin County, California, is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Secretary of the Army and the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 545, 87th Congress, 2nd Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, Public Law 87-874, 87th Congress, 2nd Session, 76 Stat. 1173, at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out said project are appropriated by Congress; provided, that the requirement that local interests shall
 contribute in cash 3 percent of the federal construction costs of the Ross Valley unit is for payment of a local benefit, and such cost shall not be payable or reimbursable by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

12735.

The Marin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874, 76 Stat. 1173), will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized by Section 12734.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

12736.

The Marin County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12734 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Marin County Flood Control and Water Conservation Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

12737.

The project for flood protection on the Klamath River at and in the vicinity of Klamath, California, is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 478, 89th Congress, as authorized by the Flood Control Act of 1966 (Title II of the act approved November 7, 1966, Public Law 89-789, 80 Stat. 1405), at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated, from time to time, for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, to be available for expenditure as funds for carrying out said project are appropriated by Congress. “Lands,
 easements, and rights-of-way” for this project may include lands for the relocation site of the town of Klamath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

12738.

The County of Del Norte shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the Flood Control Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-789, 80 Stat. 1405), will be furnished by the county in connection with the plan for flood control purposes adopted and authorized in Section 12737.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

12739.

The County of Del Norte, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12737, and may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part. The county may acquire lands, easements, and rights-of-way for the project, including those required for the relocated site of the town of Klamath.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

12740.

The project for flood protection for the Lakeport Reservoir on Scott Creek in Lake County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document 259, 89th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1083, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1965), at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of
 available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1291.)
-------------------------------------------

12741.

The Lake County Watershed Protection District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1083, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1965), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12740.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 108, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12742.

The Lake County Watershed Protection District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12740, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 108, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12743.

The project for flood protection on San Diego River (Mission Valley), California, is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 212, 89th Congress, as authorized by the Flood Control Act of 1965 (Title II of the Act approved October 27, 1965, Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, 1084), at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available
 funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12743.1.

The City of San Diego shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the act approved October 27, 1965, (Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1965), will be furnished by the city in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12743.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12743.2.

The City of San Diego, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12743, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12744.

The project for flood protection on the Tijuana River in California is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the “Report on an International Flood Control Project, Tijuana River Basin”, prepared by the United States Section, International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico, and as authorized by the act approved October 10, 1966, Public Law 89-640, 80 Stat. 884, at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department; provided, that the requirement that local interests pay a portion of the construction costs, based upon land enhancement,
 is for payment of local benefits not related to flood control, and shall not be payable or reimbursable by the state. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

12744.1.

The City of San Diego shall give assurances satisfactory to the United States that the local cooperation required by federal legislation in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12744 will be furnished by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

12744.2.

The City of San Diego, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12744, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

12745.

The project for flood protection on the Sweetwater River in the County of San Diego is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 148, 90th Congress, Second Session, at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of the other statewide programs in appropriations of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

12745.1.

With respect to the project authorized by Section 12745, the County of San Diego may acquire the lands, easements and rights-of-way for said project even though the project has not been authorized by the Congress. In the event said lands, easements, and rights-of-way for said project are acquired by the county in cooperation with the State Department of Public Works along with the lands, easements, and rights-of-way acquired by said department for state highway purposes, the County of San Diego may make application to the Department of Water Resources for reimbursement pursuant to Section 12829, and reimbursement for the costs of such lands, easements, and rights-of-way for
 the project may be paid after the Congress has appropriated funds for the construction of the project. Prior to the acquisition of any lands, easements, or rights-of-way for the project, the County of San Diego shall execute an agreement with the department under which it agrees to hold the state harmless from damages due from the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

12746.

The project for flood protection on Tahquitz Creek in California is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 223, 89th Congress, as authorized by the Flood Control Act of 1965 (Title II of the act approved October 27, 1965, Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, 1084), at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department; provided, that the requirement that local interests pay a portion of the construction costs, based upon land enhancement, is for payment of local benefits not related to
 flood control, and shall not be payable or reimbursable by the state. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12746.1.

The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the United States that the local cooperation required by federal legislation in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12746 will be furnished by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12746.2.

The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12746, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

12747.

The plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on Cucamonga Creek in San Bernardino County is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 323, 90th Congress, as adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved August 13, 1968 (Public Law 90-483, the “Flood Control Act of 1968”), at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in
 appropriation of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1456.)
-------------------------------------------

12747.1.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved August 13, 1968 (Public Law 90-483, the “Flood Control Act of 1968”), will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of improvement for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12747.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1456.)
-------------------------------------------

12747.2.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plan of improvement for flood control referred to in Section 12747 and exercise all powers granted to it in the San Bernardino County Flood Control Act (Chapter 73, Statutes of 1939), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1456.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.

(a) The plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on the Napa River in Napa County is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 222, 89th Congress, as adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, the “Flood Control Act of 1965”), as modified by data in the General Design Memorandum transmitted December 8, 1970, by the District Engineer, San Francisco District, United States Army Corps of Engineers, to the Director of Water Resources, at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the
 recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriation of available funds.

(b) (1) The state payments on the Napa River Flood Control Project shall be 75 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located, and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of those channel improvements or rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits,
 or for access roads, and shall be 90 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project.

(2) The local agency payments on the Napa River Flood Control Project shall be 25 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located, and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction, operation, or maintenance of such channel improvements or rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits or for access roads, and shall be 10 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project.

(c) The local agency may receive credit against its share of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way for lands required for the project which were acquired not more than five years prior to federal authorization of the project. The amount of this credit shall be determined by the department by applying the 75 percent representing the state portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way to the actual costs of the local agency in the case of acquisition by purchase or condemnation, and to the fair market value at the time of title transfer in the case of acquisition free of charge. The department is authorized to loan the local agency the funds necessary to pay the
 local portion of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way less any credit for acquired lands granted to the local agency by the department. These loans may not exceed a period of 10 years and the rate of interest on the loans shall be the current rate for the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account. These loans shall be repaid in annual installments beginning one year after
 the loan is made. Annual loan payments may be deducted from the state’s annual tax subvention to the local agency, if any. In the event that the local agency does not receive tax subventions from the state adequate to make the loan payment and becomes in default on the loan payments, the local agency, notwithstanding any other provisions of any statute limiting its tax ceiling, shall levy sufficient taxes to repay the loan. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the local agency is authorized to accept the loans authorized pursuant to this section.

(d) The state share of the nonfederal costs of the project shall be for those project costs incurred on or after October 27, 1965, the date on which the project was authorized by Congress, as set forth in the Flood Control Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-298).

(e) State
 funding authorized for the purposes of fulfilling the state share of the nonfederal share of flood control projects authorized in this chapter may be used within the authorized project boundaries as set forth in the General Design Memorandum transmitted December 8, 1970, by the District Engineer, San Francisco District, United States Army Corps of Engineers, to the Director of Water Resources. The state, through the Flood Control Subventions Program, may fund construction of the incomplete portions of the authorized project when federal funds are not available for project completion. The state share of the funding for project completion shall be 75 percent of the costs of lands and rights or interests in lands whereon channel improvements and channel rectifications are located, and of lands, rights, or interests in lands necessary in connection with the construction,
 operation, or maintenance of those channel improvements or rectifications, including those necessary for flowage purposes, spoil areas, borrow pits, or for access roads, and shall be 90 percent of the costs of the relocation, reconstruction, or replacement of existing improvements, structures, or utilities rendered necessary by the project, except that state funding provided pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed the equivalent state share if there were federal project
 funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 412, Sec. 1.   (SB 1073)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.1.

The Napa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved October 27, 1965 (Public Law 89-298, the “Flood Control Act of 1965”), will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of improvement for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12748.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 921.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.2.

The Napa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plan of improvement for flood control referred to in Section 12748 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Napa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act (Chapter 1449, Statutes of 1951), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 921.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.3.

(a) The state may provide funds in accordance with Section 12585.7 to the City of St. Helena, or to local agencies in the County of Napa, for the project for flood control on the Napa River in the County of Napa authorized by Section 5054 of the federal Water Resources Development Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-114), as follows:

(1) At an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of
 the department.

(2) Upon a specific written determination by the department that the project meets the requirements of Section 12582.7.

(b) The state assumes no liability for damages that may result from the project by either of the following:

(1) Authorizing the provision of funds in accordance with this section.

(2) The appropriation by the Legislature of these funds upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(c) A county or local agency may receive the funds only if it enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the city or local agency agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability
 for damages that may result from the project.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “liability for damages” includes, but is not limited to, liability for damages relating to the construction or operation of the project or the failure of the project to operate as intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.5.

The project for flood control construction of debris basins and channel clearing in the Santa Barbara, California, area as authorized by Public Law 92-184 (85 Stat. 627) is adopted and authorized at such cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. Eligible costs incurred by the Santa Barbara County Flood Control and Water Conservation District subsequent to November 1, 1971, are hereby declared eligible for state reimbursement in accordance with the following criteria:

(a) The state shall pay 75 percent of the costs of
 lands, easements, and rights-of-way apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage.

(b) The district shall pay 25 percent of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way apportioned to the benefits resulting from the reduction of flood damage and all of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way apportioned to the benefits resulting from increased or higher utilization of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.6.

The Santa Barbara County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that local cooperation, required by Section 3 of the Flood Control Act of 1936 (Public Law 738—74th Congress), as amended by Section 2 of the Flood Control Act of 1938 (Public Law 761—75th Congress), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12748.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

12748.7.

The Santa Barbara County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12748.5, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.

The project for flood protection on Wildcat and San Pablo Creeks in Contra Costa County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Secretary of the Army and the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 94-511, 94th Congress, Second Session, as authorized by the Senate Committee on Public Works Resolution adopted June 15, 1976, and the House Committee on Public Works and Transportaiton Resolution adopted June 9, 1976, Docket number 201-70, pursuant to the provisions of Section 201 of Public Law 89-298, 89th Congress (79 Stat 1073) at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the
 Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

The department is authorized to loan the local agency the funds necessary to pay the local portion of the costs of lands, easements and rights-of-way, less any credits for lands acquired prior to authorization. The department is authorized to pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.1.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by House Document Numbered 94-511, 94th Congress, Second Session, will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12749.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.2.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and project referred to in Section 12749 and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purpose of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.3.

The project for flood control runoff retardation and soil erosion prevention in the watershed of the Hagador-Tin Mine-Kroonen Oak Street Channel, as authorized by Section 216 of the Flood Control Act of 1950, Public Law 81-516, 81st Congress, 2nd Session (64 Stat. 163), is adopted and authorized at such cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.4.

The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give the necessary assurances that the local cooperation required by the United States on the project adopted and authorized in Section 12749.3 shall be furnished by the district. The district shall execute the project in conjunction with the Secretary of Agriculture and may make such modifications and amendments to the project as may be necessary to execute it for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.5.

The project for flood protection on the San Luis Rey River in San Diego County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Secretary of the Army and the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 91-106, 91st Congress, Second Session, as authorized by the Senate Committee on Public Works Resolution adopted December 17, 1970, and the House Committee on Public Works and Transportation Resolution adopted December 15, 1970, pursuant to the provisions of Section 201 of Public Law 89-298, 89th Congress (79 Stat. 1073) at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the
 Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. The department may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12749.6.
